Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-336
County contracts; when invalid.

All contracts, either express or implied, entered into with any county board, for or on behalf of any county, and all orders given by any such board or any of the members thereof, for any article, service, public improvement, material or labor in contravention of any statutory limitation, or when there are or were no funds legally available therefor, or in the absence of a statute expressly authorizing such contract to be entered into, or such order to be given, are hereby declared unlawful and shall be wholly void as an obligation against any such county.

Laws 1905, c. 55, § 1, p. 301;

R.S.1913, § 1104;

C.S.1922, § 1038;

C.S.1929, § 26-732;

R.S.1943, § 23-336.

Employment of administrative assistant did not violate this section in absence of showing that funds were not legally available. Thiles v. County Board of Sarpy County, 189 Neb. 1, 200 N.W.2d 13 (1972).

Intention was to declare contracts unlawful where no statutory authority therefor exists. Capital Bridge Co. v. County of Saunders, 164 Neb. 304, 83 N.W.2d 18 (1957).

Contract for employment of expert to make an appraisal and comparative valuation on real estate in county did not violate this section. Speer v. Kratzenstein, 143 Neb. 310, 12 N.W.2d 360 (1943).

County, which has contracted to expend all funds raised by emergency legislation for poor relief and has exhausted the general fund, cannot be compelled by mandamus to contract further and issue warrants for payment. State ex rel. Boxberger v. Burns, 132 Neb. 31, 270 N.W. 656 (1937).

Right of county board to employ physician in an emergency upheld. Bartlett v. Dahlsten, 104 Neb. 738, 178 N.W. 636 (1920).

Section does not apply to payment to precinct assessors for official services. Hiatt v. Tomlinson, 102 Neb. 730, 169 N.W. 270 (1918).

Legislature by special act could authorize payment for articles purchased and retained by county in violation of this section. Gibson v. Sherman County, 97 Neb. 79, 149 N.W. 107 (1914).